District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.22

Waiver of licensure requirements — Meeting educational requirements.

The Board of Respiratory Care shall waive the examination requirement for any applicant who meets the educational requirements for licensure as a respiratory therapist, whether full time or not, within a 3-year period immediately preceding March 14, 1995, and is qualified to do so on the basis of pertinent experience, and demonstrated current competence, provided that application for the license is made within 12 months of October 17, 2002.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 721
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-203, § 2(h), 41 DCR 7707
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 7(d), 43 DCR 530
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-197, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7642
1981 Ed., § 2-3307.22.
D.C. Law 14-197 substituted “12 months of October 17, 2002” for “24 months of March 14, 1995”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Education and Examination Exemption for Respiratory Care Practitioners Temporary Amendment Act of 2002(D.C. Law 14-142, May 21, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 5059).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Education and Examination Exemption for Respiratory Care Practitioners Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-280, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2293).